Washington statutes.
RCW 18.138.010

Definitions.

(1) "Dietetics" is the integration and application of scientific principles of food, nutrition, biochemistry, physiology, management, and behavioral and social sciences in counseling people to achieve and maintain health. Unique functions of dietetics include, but are not limited to:

(a) Assessing individual and community food practices and nutritional status using anthropometric, biochemical, clinical, dietary, and demographic data for clinical, research, and program planning purposes;

(b) Establishing priorities, goals, and objectives that meet nutritional needs and are consistent with available resources and constraints;

(c) Providing nutrition counseling and education as components of preventive, curative, and restorative health care;

(d) Developing, implementing, managing, and evaluating nutrition care systems; and

(e) Evaluating, making changes in, and maintaining appropriate standards of quality in food and nutrition care services.

(2) "General nutrition services" means the counseling and/or educating of groups or individuals in the selection of food to meet normal nutritional needs for health maintenance, which includes, but is not restricted to:

(a) Assessing the nutritional needs of individuals and groups by planning, organizing, coordinating, and evaluating the nutrition components of community health care services;

(b) Supervising, administering, or teaching normal nutrition in colleges, universities, clinics, group care homes, nursing homes, hospitals, private industry, and group meetings.

(3) "Certified dietitian" means any person certified to practice dietetics under this chapter.

(4) "Certified nutritionist" means any person certified to provide general nutrition services under this chapter.

(5) "Department" means the department of health.

(6) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

[ 1991 c 3 s 278; 1988 c 277 s 1.]